Washington statutes.
RCW 15.08.050

Condemnation of infected property—Disposal of, unlawful.

If the premises or property inspected is found to be infected the inspecting officer shall condemn the same and serve upon the owner or person in charge thereof a written notice of the condemnation, describing the premises or property with reasonable certainty, and ordering the infected portion to be disinfected, or to be destroyed if incapable of disinfection, within a time and in a manner stated therein, and giving notice that if the order is not complied with in the time stated, the officer will disinfect or destroy the property and charge the expense thereof to the owner or against the premises.

No person shall ship, sell, or otherwise dispose of or part with possession of, or transport, any such condemned property until all requirements of said notice and order are complied with and written permit of the inspector so to do is issued.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.08.050. Prior: 1943 c 150 s 4, part; 1929 c 150 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 108 s 1, part; 1919 c 195 s 2 1/2, part; 1915 c 166 s 10, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 2848, part.]